Utah statutes.
77-18-4.   Sentence -- Term -- Construction.
(1)  Whenever a person is convicted of a crime and the judgment provides for a
commitment to the state prison, the court shall not fix a definite term of
imprisonment unless otherwise provided by law.
(2)  The sentence and judgment of imprisonment shall be for an indeterminate
term of not less than the minimum and not to exceed the maximum term provided
by law for the particular crime.
(3)  Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, every sentence, regardless
of its form or terms, which purports to be for a shorter or different period
of time, shall be construed to be a sentence for the term between the minimum
and maximum periods of time provided by law and shall continue until the
maximum period has been reached unless sooner terminated or commuted by
authority of the Board of Pardons and Parole.
